Washington statutes.
RCW 44.68.010

Definitions.

Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter.

(1) "Administrative committee" means the joint legislative systems administrative committee created under RCW 44.68.030.

(2) "Center" means the legislative service center established under RCW 44.68.060.

(3) "Coordinator" means the legislative systems coordinator employed under RCW 44.68.040.

[ 2020 c 114 s 9; 2007 c 18 s 1; 1986 c 61 s 1.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2020 c 114: See note following RCW 28A.175.075.